Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1830
Authority; loans authorized; limitation.

The authority may make loans to any elementary or secondary school for the cost of any project in accordance with an agreement between the authority and such elementary or secondary school except that no such loan shall exceed the total cost of such project as determined by such elementary or secondary school and approved by the authority.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 30.